apertium-ga-gd/apertium-ga-gd.ga-full.dix
    <pardef n="riar__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adar</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>adh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aidís</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aidís</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aigí</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aimid</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aimid</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aim</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aimis</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aimis</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aim</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ainn</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amar</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ann</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ann</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ann</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ann</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fá</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fadh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fadh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>faí</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>faidh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>faidh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>faidh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>faidh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>faidh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>faidís</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>faimid</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>faimis</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fainn</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>far</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>taí</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tá</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tar</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tha</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tha</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tha</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tha</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aird/eall__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eall</l>
          <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ill</l>
          <r>eall<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dú/ch__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igh</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>igh</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="riar"><i>riar</i><par n="riar__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fairceallach"><par n="initial-f"/><i>aircealla</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fáiteall"><par n="initial-f"/><i>áit</i><par n="aird/eall__n"/></e>
    <e lm="árach"><par n="initial-á"/><i>ra</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clisiúnach"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lisiúna</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aoibheall"><par n="initial-a"/><i>oibh</i><par n="aird/eall__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bodach"><par n="initial-b"/><i>oda</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="banadhaltrach"><par n="initial-b"/><i>anadhaltra</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clúdach"><par n="initial-c"/><i>lúda</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="díobhach"><par n="initial-d"/><i>íobha</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="féaránach"><par n="initial-f"/><i>éarána</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deagánach"><par n="initial-d"/><i>eagána</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="biorearrach"><par n="initial-b"/><i>iorearra</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="coigríochach"><par n="initial-c"/><i>oigríocha</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bearach"><par n="initial-b"/><i>eara</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="banóstach"><par n="initial-b"/><i>anósta</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dícheall"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ích</i><par n="aird/eall__n"/></e>
    <e lm="doicheall"><par n="initial-d"/><i>oich</i><par n="aird/eall__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceithearnach"><par n="initial-c"/><i>eithearna</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="banóglach"><par n="initial-b"/><i>anógla</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amhrastach"><par n="initial-a"/><i>mhrasta</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dromlach"><par n="initial-d"/><i>romla</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="forránach"><par n="initial-f"/><i>orrána</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bardach"><par n="initial-b"/><i>arda</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fasach"><par n="initial-f"/><i>asa</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cábúnach"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ábúna</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="airdeall"><par n="initial-a"/><i>ird</i><par n="aird/eall__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aontumhach"><par n="initial-a"/><i>ontumha</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="crústach"><par n="initial-c"/><i>rústa</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bithiúnach"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ithiúna</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iallach"><par n="initial-i"/><i>alla</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="garbhlach"><par n="initial-g"/><i>arbhla</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seallach"><par n="initial-s"/><i>ealla</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guairdeall"><par n="initial-g"/><i>uaird</i><par n="aird/eall__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ginealach"><par n="initial-g"/><i>ineala</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="íoslach"><par n="initial-í"/><i>osla</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gearrbhodach"><par n="initial-g"/><i>earrbhoda</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rítheaghlach"><i>rítheaghla</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="séarach"><par n="initial-s"/><i>éara</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leasrach"><i>leasra</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ronnach"><i>ronna</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mamach"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ama</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seandícheall"><par n="initial-s"/><i>eandích</i><par n="aird/eall__n"/></e>
    <e lm="miodach"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ioda</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trírothach"><par n="initial-t"/><i>rírotha</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="traonach"><par n="initial-t"/><i>raona</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tosach"><par n="initial-t"/><i>osa</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tríchosach"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ríchosa</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sliomach"><par n="initial-s"/><i>lioma</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Anglach"><i>Angla</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Papuach"><i>Papua</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Paraguach"><i>Paragua</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Nasarthach"><i>Nasartha</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Seicslóvacach"><i>Seicslóvaca</i><par n="dú/ch__n"/></e>
